New Jersey, session 221, A1084.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    For any project, application for development, or activity that qualifies for an exemption pursuant to any of the provisions of section 30 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-28), the Department of Environmental Protection shall not require a deed restriction or impose any additional conditions or requirements upon the property, applicant, property owner, or person whose project, development, or activity qualifies for the exemption, as a condition of the department issuing a Highlands applicability and consistency determination or otherwise acknowledging entitlement to a statutory exemption. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall be retroactive to August 10, 2004.